Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-1,130
Sale of real estate; election; results; determination.

Such election shall be held and the results thereof determined and declared in conformity with the law governing the election of officers in such district as nearly as may be practicable; Provided, that no irregularity in the conduct of such an election, due to an error or omission, shall invalidate the same if the election shall have been otherwise fairly conducted.

Laws 1921, c. 257, § 3, p. 871;

C.S.1922, § 2935;

C.S.1929, § 46-193;

R.S.1943, § 46-1,130.